Utah statutes.
17-21-3.   Original documents or copies of original documents to be kept by
the county.
After accepting a document for recording, receiving the fees for recording it,
and completing recording procedures, the recorder shall, only if required by
statute, keep the original document or a copy of the original document as a
public record in a form sufficient to meet the requirements of this chapter.
